Utah statutes.
36-14-2.   Issuers.

Any of the following persons is an issuer, who may issue legislative subpoenas by following the procedures set forth in this chapter:

(1)  the speaker of the House of Representatives;

(2)  the president of the Senate;

(3)  a chairman of any legislative standing committee;

(4)  a chairman of any legislative interim committee;

(5)  a chairman of any special committee established by the Legislative Management Committee, the speaker of the House, or the president of the Senate;

(6)  the chairman of any subcommittee of the Legislative Management Committee;

(7)  the chairman of a Senate or House Ethics Committee;

(8)  the director of the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel;

(9)  the legislative auditor general;

(10)  the director of the Office of Legislative Fiscal Analyst; and

(11)  the legislative general counsel.



Enacted by Chapter 174, 1989 General Session

